Utah statutes.
77-16b-104.   Involuntary feeding or hydration of prisoners -- Standards, continuing jurisdiction, and records.

(1)  Any involuntary nutrition or hydration of a prisoner pursuant to this chapter shall be conducted under immediate medical supervision and in a medically recognized and acceptable manner.

(2)  Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to Section 77-16b-102, the court has the continuing jurisdiction to review the prisoner's need for involuntary nutrition or hydration as long as the prisoner remains in custody of the correctional facility.

(3)  A correctional facility shall maintain records of any involuntary feeding or hydration of prisoners under this chapter.

(a)  The records are classified as "controlled" under Section 63G-2-304.

(b)  All medical or mental health records submitted to the court under this chapter shall be kept under seal.



Enacted by Chapter 355, 2012 General Session

